Utah statutes.
63G-6-818 (Superseded 05/01/13).   Effect of violation prior to award of contract.

If prior to award it is determined administratively or upon administrative or judicial review that a solicitation or proposed award of a contract is in violation of law, the solicitation or proposed award shall be cancelled or revised to comply with the law.



Amended by Chapter 347, 2012 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

